Hawaii statutes.
§667-92 Notice of default and intention to
foreclose; contents; distribution; alternative remedies for failure to serve.
(a) When a unit owner has failed to pay an assessment, and when the
association intends to conduct a power of sale foreclosure under this part, the
association shall prepare a written notice of default and intention to
foreclose addressed to the unit owner. The notice of default and intention to
foreclose shall state:

(1) The name and address of the association;

(2) The name and last known address of the unit
owners;

(3) With respect to the unit, the address or
a description of its location, tax map key number, and certificate of
title or transfer certificate of title number if registered in the land court;

(4) The description of the default or, if
the default is a monetary default, an itemization of the delinquent amount;

(5) The action required to cure the default, including the delinquent amount and the estimated amount of the
association's attorney's fees and costs, and all other
fees and costs related to the default estimated to be incurred by the
association by the deadline date;

(6) The date by which the default must be
cured, which shall be within sixty days after service of the notice of default
and intention to foreclose;

(7) A statement that if the default is not
cured by the deadline date stated in the notice of default and intention to
foreclose, the entire unpaid balance of the moneys owed to the association will
become due, that the association intends to conduct a power of sale foreclosure
to sell the unit at a public sale without any court action and without going to
court, and that the association or any other person
may acquire the unit at the public sale;

(8) A statement that if the default is not cured by
the deadline date stated in the notice of default and intention to foreclose,
the association may publish the public notice of the public sale in a newspaper
of general circulation or on a state website, pursuant to section 667-96(d);

(9) The name,
address, electronic address, and telephone number of the attorney who is
representing the association; provided that the attorney shall be licensed to
practice law in the State and physically located in the State; and

(10) Notice of the
right of the unit owner to submit a payment plan
within thirty days pursuant to subsection (c).

(b)
The notice of default and intention to foreclose shall also contain wording
substantially similar to the following in all capital letters and printed in
not less than fourteen-point font:

"IF
THE DEFAULT ON THE PAYMENT OF ASSESSMENTS CONTINUES AFTER THE DEADLINE DATE IN THIS NOTICE, THE UNIT MAY BE
FORECLOSED AND SOLD WITHOUT ANY COURT ACTION AND WITHOUT GOING TO COURT.

YOU
MAY HAVE CERTAIN LEGAL RIGHTS OR DEFENSES. FOR ADVICE, YOU SHOULD CONSULT WITH
AN ATTORNEY LICENSED IN THIS STATE.

ALL
FUTURE NOTICES AND CORRESPONDENCE WILL BE MAILED TO YOU AT THE ADDRESS AT WHICH
YOU RECEIVED THIS NOTICE UNLESS YOU SEND WRITTEN INSTRUCTIONS TO THIS OFFICE
INFORMING THIS OFFICE OF A DIFFERENT ADDRESS. THE WRITTEN INSTRUCTIONS MUST BE
SENT TO THIS OFFICE BY CERTIFIED MAIL, REGISTERED MAIL, OR EXPRESS MAIL,
POSTAGE PREPAID AND RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED."

(c) A unit owner may submit a payment plan
within thirty days after service of a notice of default and intention to
foreclose on the unit owner. The unit owner shall submit the payment plan to
the association or its attorney by certified mail return receipt requested or
by hand delivery. The association shall not reject a reasonable payment plan.
A unit owner may also cure the default within sixty days after service of a
notice of default and intention to foreclose on the unit owner by paying the
association the full amount of the default, including the foreclosing
association's attorneys' fees and costs, and all other fees and costs related
to the default that are incurred or estimated to be incurred by the foreclosing
association. From and after the date that the unit owner gives written notice
to the association of the unit owner's intent to cure the default or timely
submits a payment plan, any nonjudicial foreclosure of the lien shall be stayed
during the sixty-day period to cure the default or during the term of the
payment plan or a longer period that is agreed upon by the parties. A unit
owner's failure to strictly perform any agreed-upon payment plan shall entitle
the association to pursue its remedies without further delay.

For purposes of this section, "reasonable
payment plan" means a plan that provides for:

(1) Timely
payment of all assessments that become due after the date that the payment plan
is proposed; and

(2) Additional
monthly payments of an amount sufficient to cure the default, within a
reasonable period under the circumstances as determined by the board of directors
in its discretion; provided that a period of up to twelve months shall be deemed reasonable; and provided further that the
board of directors shall have the discretion to agree to a payment plan in
excess of twelve months.

(d) The notice of default and intention to
foreclose shall also include contact information for approved housing
counselors and approved budget and credit counselors.

(e) The association shall have the notice of
default and intention to foreclose served on:

(1) The unit owner;

(2) Any prior or junior creditors who have a
recorded lien on the unit before the recordation of the notice of default and
intention to foreclose under section 667-93;

(3) The state director of taxation;

(4) The director of finance of the county
where the unit is located; and

(5) Any other person entitled to receive
notice under section 667-5.5.

(f) If the association is
unable to serve the notice of default and intention to foreclose on the unit
owner or any other party listed in subsection (e)(2) to (5) within sixty days,
the association may:

(1) File a special proceeding in the circuit
court of the circuit in which the unit is located, for permission to proceed
with a nonjudicial foreclosure by serving the unit owner or any other party
listed in subsection (e)(2) and (e)(5) by publication and posting;

(2) Proceed with a nonjudicial foreclosure
of the unit; provided that if the association proceeds without the permission
of the court, the association shall not be entitled to obtain a deficiency judgment
against the unit owner, and the unit owner shall have one year from the date
the association records the deed in the nonjudicial foreclosure to redeem the
unit by paying the unit owner's delinquency to the association; or

(3) Take control of the unit if the unit is
unoccupied, after giving notice to the unit owner at the unit owner's last
known address as shown on the records of the association or as determined by
the association as part of its due diligence to serve notice to the owner. The
association's authority to take control of the unit pursuant to this paragraph
shall be exercised solely for the purpose of renting the unit to generate
rental income to pay the unit owner's delinquency, and the association shall
acquire no legal title to the unit. In addition, the association shall credit
the net rental proceeds generated from the rental of the unit to the owner's
delinquency. For purposes of this paragraph, "net rental proceeds"
means the rental proceeds remaining each month after deducting:

(A) The unit's regular monthly assessments
that come due while the association controls the unit pursuant to this
subsection;

(B) Any rental agent commissions; and

(C) Expenses incurred by the association in
maintaining the unit in rentable condition.

If the
unit owner pays the full amount of the unit owner's delinquency to the
association, the association shall return control of the unit to the unit
owner; provided that the full amount of the unit owner's delinquency shall be
calculated by deducting the total net rental proceeds collected by the
association, if any, from the unit owner's delinquency. [L 2012, c 182, pt of
§3(2); am L 2014, c 4, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next